Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WATER AVAILABILITY ATLAS AND SITING METHODOLOGY FOR LARGE WATER USERS.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources to work with the Minnesota Geospatial Information Office to develop: new text end new text begin (1) a water availability atlas that uses existing data sets to quantify the availability of water across the state; and new text end new text begin (2) a methodology that can be used by state agencies, local governments, and other economic development authorities to determine appropriate siting for large water users and businesses. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2028, the commissioner must submit the atlas and methodology developed under paragraph (a) to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources and employment and economic development and must make them available to the entities described in paragraph (a), clause (2). new text end new text begin (c) The appropriation in this section is onetime. new text end